Illinois, session 104th, HB3433.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois is amended by adding Section 805-575 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 805/805-575 new)8    Sec. 805-575. Flood Risk Reduction Pilot Project. Subject 9to appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall 10design, implement, and evaluate not more than 3 demonstration 11projects that test natural flood risk reduction practices in 12flood-prone areas of the State, as determined by the 13Department. These demonstration projects shall provide for 14engineering and design, materials, construction, 15pre-construction and post-construction monitoring, and project 16management. The Department may require a county to submit to 17the Department a progress report summarizing the results to 18date of the demonstration projects by a specified date 19determined by the Department. After completion of the projects 20under this Section, the Department shall submit to the General 21Assembly and to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 22Office of Homeland Security a report summarizing the results 23of the demonstration projects and recommendations for how   HB3433 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11267 BDA 21351 b1existing State policies or funding could be adapted to create 2incentives to protect and restore natural infrastructure and 3reduce floods. The Department may adopt rules implementing 4this Section.